Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-242
Take, defined.

Take means to harass, wound, hunt, trap, fish, harvest fur, or attempt to harass, wound, hunt, trap, fish, or harvest fur.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 52.